West Virginia, session 2026, SB369.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of West Virginia: ARTICLE 9. Authorization for miscellaneous boards and agencies to promulgate legislative rules. §64-9-1. Public Service Commission. The legislative rule filed in the State Register on March 12, 2025, authorized under the authority of §24-2E-3 of this code, relating to the Public Service Commission (the occupancy of customer-provided conduit, 150 CSR 37), is authorized.